Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-693
Adjustment to value of railroad and car line property; Property Tax Administrator; powers and duties.

(1) The Property Tax Administrator in determining the taxable value of railroads and car lines shall determine the following ratios involving railroad and car line property and commercial and industrial property:

(a) The ratio of the taxable value of all commercial and industrial personal property in the state actually subjected to property tax divided by the market value of all commercial and industrial personal property in the state;

(b) The ratio of the taxable value of all commercial and industrial real property in the state actually subjected to property tax divided by the market value of all commercial and industrial real property in the state;

(c) The ratio of the taxable value of railroad personal property to the market value of railroad personal property. The numerator of the ratio shall be the taxable value of railroad personal property. The denominator of the ratio shall be the railroad system value allocated to Nebraska and multiplied by a factor representing the net book value of rail transportation personal property divided by the net book value of total rail transportation property;

(d) The ratio of the taxable value of railroad real property to the market value of railroad real property. The numerator of the ratio shall be the taxable value of railroad real property. The denominator of the ratio shall be the railroad system value allocated to Nebraska and multiplied by a factor representing the net book value of rail transportation real property divided by the net book value of total rail transportation property; and

(e) Similar calculations shall be made for car line taxable properties.

(2) If the ratio of the taxable value of railroad and car line personal or real property exceeds the ratio of the comparable taxable commercial and industrial property by more than five percent, the Property Tax Administrator may adjust the value of such railroad and car line property to the percentage of the comparable taxable commercial and industrial property pursuant to federal statute or Nebraska federal court decisions applicable thereto.

(3) For purposes of this section, commercial and industrial property shall mean all real and personal property which is devoted to commercial or industrial use other than rail transportation property and land used primarily for agricultural purposes.

(4) For tax years prior to tax year 2020, after the adjustment made pursuant to subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the Property Tax Administrator shall multiply the value of the tangible personal property of each railroad and car line by the compensating exemption factor calculated in section 77-1238.

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 219;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 86;

Laws 2015, LB259, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB1107, § 122.